Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 58
Third-Party Delivery Systems

6-58-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agreement” means a written contractual agreement between the merchant and the third-party delivery service.

“Customer” means the person, business, or other entity that places an order for merchant products through the marketplace.

“Likeness” means identifiable symbols attributed and easily identified as belonging to a specific merchant or retailer.

“Marketplace” means the third party’s proprietary online communication platform where customers can view and search the menus of merchants and place an order for merchant products via the third party’s website or mobile application for delivery or by the third-party delivery service, or an independent contractor of the third-party delivery service, to the customer.

“Merchant” means a food service establishment as set forth in §

21-27-1

or other retail entity.

“Third-party delivery service” means a company, organization, or entity, outside of the operation of the merchant’s business that facilitates delivery or online ordering services to customers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 379, § 1, effective October 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 380, § 1, effective October 11, 2021.

6-58-2.
Third-Party use of merchant trademarks and likeness.

A third-party delivery service may not use the likeness, registered trademark, or any intellectual property belonging to the merchant to falsely suggest sponsorship or endorsement by, or affiliation with the merchant.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 379, § 1, effective October 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 380, § 1, effective October 11, 2021.

6-58-3.
Merchant consent.

A third-party delivery service may not take orders and arrange for the delivery of merchant products through the third-party delivery service’s marketplace without obtaining the written consent of the merchant.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 379, § 1, effective October 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 380, § 1, effective October 11, 2021.

6-58-4.
Indemnity agreement void.

No agreement entered into in accordance with this chapter shall include a provision, clause, or covenant that requires a merchant to indemnify a third-party delivery service, any independent contractor or agent of the third-party delivery service, for any damages or harm caused by the third-party delivery service or any independent contractor or agent of the third-party delivery service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 379, § 1, effective October 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 380, § 1, effective October 11, 2021.

6-58-5.
Enforcement — Penalties.

Any merchant whose likeness was used by the third-party delivery service, or who appears on a third-party delivery service’s marketplace, in violation of this chapter, may bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the merchant or third-party delivery service is found, or in the superior court of the county as is otherwise provided by law, to recover actual damages or five thousand dollars ($5,000), whichever is greater. The court may, in its discretion, and where the conduct involves reckless or callous indifference to statutorily protected rights, award punitive damages and other equitable relief it deems appropriate.

Any third-party delivery service who or that violates this chapter shall pay to the state a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation. Each day a violation occurs shall count as a separate violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 379, § 1, effective October 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 380, § 1, effective October 11, 2021.

6-58-6.
Uniformity.

No municipality shall establish, mandate, or implement any law inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 379, § 1, effective October 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 380, § 1, effective October 11, 2021.